North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 9. Solid Waste Management.
§ 130A-309.203.
Expedited permit review.

The Department shall act as expeditiously as practicable, but no later than the deadlines established under subsection (b) of this section, except in compliance with subsection (c) of this section, to issue all permits necessary to conduct activities
required by this Part.

Notwithstanding G.S. 130A-295.8(e), the Department shall determine whether an application for any permit necessary to conduct activities required by this Part is complete within 30 days after the Department receives the application for the permit. A determination
of completeness means that the application includes all required components but does not mean that the required components provide all of the information that is required for the Department to make a decision on the application.
If the Department determines that an application is not complete, the Department shall notify the applicant of the components needed to complete the application. An applicant may submit additional information to the Department
to cure the deficiencies in the application. The Department shall make a final determination as to whether the application is complete within the later of (i) 30 days after the Department receives the application for the permit
less the number of days that the applicant uses to provide the additional information or (ii) 10 days after the Department receives the additional information from the applicant. The Department shall issue a draft permit decision
on an application for a permit within 90 days after the Department determines that the application is complete. The Department shall hold a public hearing and accept written comment on the draft permit decision for a period of
not less than 30 or more than 60 days after the Department issues a draft permit decision. The Department shall issue a final permit decision on an application for a permit within 60 days after the comment period on the draft permit
decision closes. If the Department fails to act within any time period set out in this subsection, the applicant may treat the failure to act as a denial of the permit and may challenge the denial as provided in Chapter 150B of
the General Statutes.

If the Department finds that compliance with the deadlines established under subsection (b) of this section would result in insufficient review of a permit application that would pose a risk to public health, safety, and welfare; the environment; or natural
resources, the applicable deadline shall be waived for the application as necessary to allow for adequate review. If a deadline is waived pursuant to this subsection, the Secretary shall issue a written declaration, including findings
of fact, documenting the need for the waiver.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section or any other provision of law, the Department shall either issue or deny a permit required for dewatering of a retired impoundment within 90 days of receipt of a completed application, in such a form
and including such information as the Department may prescribe, for the dewatering activities. The Department shall accept written comment on a draft permit decision for a period of not less than 30 days or more than 60 days prior
to issuance or denial of such a permit. If the Department fails to act within any time period set out in this subsection, the applicant may treat the failure to act as a denial of the permit and may challenge the denial as provided
in Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

History.
2014-122, s. 3(a).

§ 130A-309.204.
Reports.

The Department shall submit quarterly written reports to the Environmental Review Commission on its operations, activities, programs, and progress with respect to its obligations under this Part concerning all coal combustion residuals surface impoundments.
At a minimum, the report shall include information concerning the status of assessment, corrective action, prioritization, and closure for each coal combustion residuals surface impoundment and information on costs connected therewith.
The report shall include an executive summary of each annual Groundwater Protection and Restoration Report submitted to the Department by the operator of any coal combustion residuals surface impoundments pursuant to G.S. 130A-309.211(d)
and a summary of all groundwater sampling, protection, and restoration activities related to the impoundment for the preceding year. The report shall also include an executive summary of each annual Surface Water Protection and
Restoration Report submitted to the Department by the operator of any coal combustion residuals surface impoundments pursuant to G.S. 130A-309.212(e) and a summary of all surface water sampling, protection, and restoration activities
related to the impoundment for the preceding year, including the status of the identification, assessment, and correction of unpermitted discharges from coal combustion residuals surface impoundments to the surface waters of the
State. The Department shall supplement the written reports required by this subsection with additional written and oral reports as may be requested by the Environmental Review Commission. The Department shall submit the written
reports required by this subsection whether or not the General Assembly is in session at the time the report is due.

On or before October 1 of each year, the Department shall report to each member of the General Assembly who has a coal combustion residuals surface impoundment in the member’s district. This report shall include the location of each impoundment in the
member’s district, the amount of coal combustion residuals known or believed to be located in the impoundment, the last action taken at the impoundment, and the date of that last action.

On or before October 1 of each year, a public utility generating coal combustion residuals and coal combustion products shall submit an annual summary to the Department. The annual summary shall be for the period of July 1 through June 30 and shall include
all of the following:

The volume of coal combustion residuals and products produced.

The volume of coal combustion residuals disposed.

The volume of coal combustion products used in structural fill projects.

The volume of coal combustion products beneficially used, other than for structural fill.

History.
2014-122, s. 3(a); 2016-95, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2016-95, s. 1, effective July 14, 2016, in subsection (a), deleted “and the Coal Ash Management Commission” following “Environmental Review Commission” in the first sentence.

§ 130A-309.205.
Local ordinances regulating management of coal combustion residuals and coal combustion products invalid; petition to preempt local ordinance.

It is the intent of the General Assembly to maintain a uniform system for the management of coal combustion residuals and coal combustion products, including matters of disposal and beneficial use, and to place limitations upon the exercise by all units
of local government in North Carolina of the power to regulate the management of coal combustion residuals and coal combustion products by means of ordinances, property restrictions, zoning regulations, or otherwise. Notwithstanding
any authority granted to counties, municipalities, or other local authorities to adopt local ordinances, including those imposing taxes, fees, or charges or regulating health, environment, or land use, all provisions of local ordinances,
including those regulating land use, adopted by counties, municipalities, or other local authorities that regulate or have the effect of regulating the management of coal combustion residuals and coal combustion products, including
regulation of carbon burn-out plants, within the jurisdiction of a local government are invalidated and unenforceable, to the extent necessary to effectuate the purposes of this Part, that do the following:

Place any restriction or condition not placed by this Part upon management of coal combustion residuals or coal combustion products within any county, city, or other political subdivision.

Conflict or are in any manner inconsistent with the provisions of this Part.

(a1)
As used in this section, “Commission” means the Environmental Management Commission.

If a local zoning or land-use ordinance imposes requirements, restrictions, or conditions that are generally applicable to development, including, but not limited to, setback, buffer, and stormwater requirements, and coal combustion residuals and coal
combustion products would be regulated under the ordinance of general applicability, the operator of the proposed activities may petition the Environmental Management Commission to review the matter. After receipt of a petition,
the Commission shall hold a hearing in accordance with the procedures in subsection (c) of this section and shall determine whether or to what extent to preempt the local ordinance to allow for the management of coal combustion
residuals and coal combustion products.

When a petition described in subsection (b) of this section has been filed with the Environmental Management Commission, the Commission shall hold a public hearing to consider the petition. The public hearing shall be held in the affected locality within
60 days after receipt of the petition by the Commission. The Commission shall give notice of the public hearing by both of the following means:

Publication in a newspaper or newspapers having general circulation in the county or counties where the activities are to be conducted, once a week for three consecutive weeks, the first notice appearing at least 30 days prior to the scheduled date of
the hearing.

First-class mail to persons who have requested notice. The Commission shall maintain a mailing list of persons who request notice in advance of the hearing pursuant to this section. Notice by mail shall be complete upon deposit of a copy of the notice
in a postage-paid wrapper addressed to the person to be notified at the address that appears on the mailing list maintained by the Commission in a post office or official depository under the exclusive care and custody
of the United States Postal Service.

Any interested person may appear before the Environmental Management Commission at the hearing to offer testimony. In addition to testimony before the Commission, any interested person may submit written evidence to the Commission for the Commission’s
consideration. At least 20 days shall be allowed for receipt of written comment following the hearing.

A local zoning or land-use ordinance is presumed to be valid and enforceable to the extent the zoning or land-use ordinance imposes requirements, restrictions, or conditions that are generally applicable to development, including, but not limited to,
setback, buffer, and stormwater requirements, unless the Environmental Management Commission makes a finding of fact to the contrary. The Commission shall determine whether or to what extent to preempt local ordinances so as to
allow the project involving management of coal combustion residuals and coal combustion products no later than 60 days after conclusion of the hearing. The Commission shall preempt a local ordinance only if the Commission makes
all of the following findings:

That there is a local ordinance that would regulate the management of coal combustion residuals and coal combustion products.

That all legally required State and federal permits or approvals have been issued by the appropriate State and federal agencies or that all State and federal permit requirements have been satisfied and that the permits or approvals have been denied or
withheld only because of the local ordinance.

That local citizens and elected officials have had adequate opportunity to participate in the permitting process.

That the project involving management of coal combustion residuals and coal combustion products will not pose an unreasonable health or environmental risk to the surrounding locality and that the operator has taken or consented to take reasonable measures
to avoid or manage foreseeable risks and to comply to the maximum feasible extent with applicable local ordinances.

If the Environmental Management Commission does not make all of the findings under subsection (e) of this section, the Commission shall not preempt the challenged local ordinance. The Commission’s decision shall be in writing and shall identify the evidence
submitted to the Commission plus any additional evidence used in arriving at the decision.

The decision of the Environmental Management Commission shall be final, unless a party to the action files a written appeal under Article 3 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, as modified by this section, within 30 days of the date of the decision.
The record on appeal shall consist of all materials and information submitted to or considered by the Commission, the Commission’s written decision, a complete transcript of the hearing, the specific findings required by subsection
(e) of this section, and any minority positions on the specific findings required by subsection (e) of this section. The scope of judicial review shall be as set forth in

G.S. 150B-51

, except as this subsection provides regarding the record on appeal.

If the court reverses or modifies the decision of the Environmental Management Commission, the judge shall set out in writing, which writing shall become part of the record, the reasons for the reversal or modification.

In computing any period of time prescribed or allowed by the procedure in this section, the provisions of Rule 6(a) of the Rules of Civil Procedure,

G.S. 1A-1

, shall apply.

History.
2014-122, s. 3(a); 2015-1, s. 3.1(b); 2015-264, s. 56.2(b).

§ 130A-309.206.
Federal preemption; severability.

The provisions of this Part shall be severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision is declared to be unconstitutional or otherwise invalid or is preempted by federal law or regulation, the validity of the remainder of this Part shall not
be affected thereby.

History.
2014-122, s. 3(a).

§ 130A-309.207.
General rule making for Part.

The Environmental Management Commission shall adopt rules as necessary to implement the provisions of the Part. Such rules shall be exempt from the requirements of

G.S. 150B-19.3

.

History.
2014-122, s. 3(a).

§§ 130A-309.208,
130A-309.209.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Subpart 2. Management of Coal Ash Residuals; Closure of Coal Ash Impoundments.

§ 130A-309.210.
Generation, disposal, and use of coal combustion residuals.

On or after October 1, 2014, the construction of new and expansion of existing coal combustion residuals surface impoundments is prohibited.

On or after October 1, 2014, the disposal of coal combustion residuals into a coal combustion residuals surface impoundment at an electric generating facility where the coal-fired generating units are no longer producing coal combustion residuals is prohibited.

On or after December 31, 2018, the discharge of stormwater into a coal combustion surface impoundment at an electric generating facility where the coal-fired generating units are no longer producing coal combustion residuals is prohibited.

On or after December 31, 2019, the discharge of stormwater into a coal combustion surface impoundment at an electric generating facility where the coal-fired generating units are actively producing coal combustion residuals is prohibited.

On or before December 31, 2018, all electric generating facilities owned by a public utility shall convert to the disposal of “dry” fly ash or the facility shall be retired. For purposes of this subsection, the term “dry” means coal combustion residuals
that are not in the form of liquid wastes, wastes containing free liquids, or sludges.

On or before December 31, 2019, all electric generating facilities owned by a public utility shall convert to the disposal of “dry” bottom ash or the facility shall be retired. For purposes of this subsection, the term “dry” means coal combustion residuals
that are not in the form of liquid wastes, wastes containing free liquids, or sludges.

History.
2014-122, s. 3(a).

Local Modification.

Buncombe: 2015-110, s. 2(b) (as to subsections (c) through (f), and coal combustion residuals surface impoundments and electric generating facilities at site of Asheville Steam Electric Generating Plant).

§ 130A-309.211.
Groundwater assessment and corrective action; drinking water supply well survey and provision of alternate water supply; reporting.

Groundwater Assessment of Coal Combustion Residuals Surface Impoundments. — The owner of a coal combustion residuals surface impoundment shall conduct groundwater monitoring and assessment as provided in this subsection. The requirements for groundwater
monitoring and assessment set out in this subsection are in addition to any other groundwater monitoring and assessment requirements applicable to the owners of coal combustion residuals surface impoundments:

No later than December 31, 2014, the owner of a coal combustion residuals surface impoundment shall submit a proposed Groundwater Assessment Plan for the impoundment to the Department for its review and approval. The Groundwater Assessment Plan shall,
at a minimum, provide for all of the following:

A description of all receptors and significant exposure pathways.

An assessment of the horizontal and vertical extent of soil and groundwater contamination for all contaminants confirmed to be present in groundwater in exceedance of groundwater quality standards.

A description of all significant factors affecting movement and transport of contaminants.

A description of the geological and hydrogeological features influencing the chemical and physical character of the contaminants.

A schedule for continued groundwater monitoring.

Any other information related to groundwater assessment required by the Department.

The Department shall approve the Groundwater Assessment Plan if it determines that the Plan complies with the requirements of this subsection and will be sufficient to protect public health, safety, and welfare; the environment; and natural resources.

No later than 10 days from approval of the Groundwater Assessment Plan, the owner shall begin implementation of the Plan.

No later than 180 days from approval of the Groundwater Assessment Plan, the owner shall submit a Groundwater Assessment Report to the Department. The Report shall describe all exceedances of groundwater quality standards associated with the impoundment.

Corrective Action for the Restoration of Groundwater Quality. — The owner of a coal combustion residuals surface impoundment shall implement corrective action for the restoration of groundwater quality as provided in this subsection. The requirements
for corrective action for the restoration of groundwater quality set out in this subsection are in addition to any other corrective action for the restoration of groundwater quality requirements applicable to the owners of coal
combustion residuals surface impoundments:

No later than 90 days from submission of the Groundwater Assessment Report required by subsection (a) of this section, or a time frame otherwise approved by the Department not to exceed 180 days from submission of the Groundwater Assessment Report, the
owner of the coal combustion residuals surface impoundment shall submit a proposed Groundwater Corrective Action Plan to the Department for its review and approval. The Groundwater Corrective Action Plan shall provide for
the restoration of groundwater in conformance with the requirements of Subchapter L of Chapter 2 of Title 15A of the North Carolina Administrative Code. The Groundwater Corrective Action Plan shall include, at a minimum,
all of the following:

A description of all exceedances of the groundwater quality standards, including any exceedances that the owner asserts are the result of natural background conditions.

A description of the methods for restoring groundwater in conformance with the requirements of Subchapter L of Chapter 2 of Title 15A of the North Carolina Administrative Code and a detailed explanation of the reasons for selecting these methods.

Specific plans, including engineering details, for restoring groundwater quality.

A schedule for implementation of the Plan.

A monitoring plan for evaluating the effectiveness of the proposed corrective action and detecting movement of any contaminant plumes.

Any other information related to groundwater assessment required by the Department.

The Department shall approve the Groundwater Corrective Action Plan if it determines that the Plan complies with the requirements of this subsection and will be sufficient to protect public health, safety, and welfare; the environment; and natural resources.

No later than 30 days from the approval of the Groundwater Corrective Action Plan, the owner shall begin implementation of the Plan in accordance with the Plan’s schedule.

Drinking Water Supply Well Survey and Provision of Alternate Water Supply. — No later than October 1, 2014, the owner of a coal combustion residuals surface impoundment shall conduct a Drinking Water Supply Well Survey that identifies all drinking water
supply wells within one-half mile down-gradient from the established compliance boundary of the impoundment and submit the Survey to the Department. The Survey shall include well locations, the nature of water uses, available well
construction details, and information regarding ownership of the wells. No later than December 1, 2014, the Department shall determine, based on the Survey, which drinking water supply wells the owner is required to sample and
how frequently and for what period sampling is required. The Department shall require sampling for drinking water supply wells where data regarding groundwater quality and flow and depth in the area of any surveyed well provide
a reasonable basis to predict that the quality of water from the surveyed well may be adversely impacted by constituents associated with the presence of the impoundment. No later than January 1, 2015, the owner shall initiate sampling
and water quality analysis of the drinking water supply wells. A property owner may elect to have an independent third party selected from a laboratory certified by the Department’s Wastewater/Groundwater Laboratory Certification
program sample wells located on their property in lieu of sampling conducted by the owner of the coal combustion residuals surface impoundment. The owner of the coal combustion residuals surface impoundment shall pay for the reasonable
costs of such sampling. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to preclude or impair the right of any property owner to refuse such sampling of wells on their property. If the sampling and water quality analysis indicates
that water from a drinking water supply well exceeds groundwater quality standards for constituents associated with the presence of the impoundment, the owner shall replace the contaminated drinking water supply well with an alternate
supply of potable drinking water and an alternate supply of water that is safe for other household uses. The alternate supply of potable drinking water shall be supplied within 24 hours of the Department’s determination that there
is an exceedance of groundwater quality standards attributable to constituents associated with the presence of the impoundment. The alternate supply of water that is safe for other household uses shall be supplied within 30 days
of the Department’s determination that there is an exceedance of groundwater quality standards attributable to constituents associated with the presence of the impoundment. The requirement to replace a contaminated drinking water
supply well with an alternate supply of potable drinking water and an alternate supply of water that is safe for other household uses set out in this subsection is in addition to any other requirements to replace a contaminated
drinking water supply well with an alternate supply of potable drinking water or an alternate supply of water that is safe for other household uses applicable to the owners of coal combustion residuals surface impoundments.

(c1) (See editor’s note for applicability) Provision of Permanent Water Supply. — As soon as practicable, but no later than October 15, 2018, the owner of a coal combustion residuals surface impoundment shall establish permanent replacement water supplies
for (i) each household that has a drinking water supply well located within a one-half mile radius from the established compliance boundary of a coal combustion residuals impoundment, and is not separated from the impoundment
by the mainstem of a river, as that term is defined under

G.S. 143-215.22

G, or other body of water that would prevent the migration of contaminants through groundwater from the impoundment to a well and (ii) each household that has a drinking water supply well that is located in
an area in which contamination resulting from constituents associated with the presence of a coal combustion residuals impoundment is expected to migrate, as demonstrated by groundwater modeling and hydrogeologic, geologic,
and geotechnical investigations of the site, conducted in accordance with the requirements of G.S. 130A-309.214(a)(4), and the results of other modeling or investigations that may have been submitted pursuant to G.S. 130A-309.213(b)(4).
Preference shall be given to permanent replacement water supplies by connection to public water supplies; provided that (i) a household may elect to receive a filtration system in lieu of a connection to public water supplies
and (ii) if the Department determines that connection to a public water supply to a particular household would be cost-prohibitive, the Department shall authorize provision of a permanent replacement water supply to that household
through installation of a filtration system. For households for which filtration systems are installed, the impoundment owner shall be responsible for periodic required maintenance of the filtration system. No later than December
15, 2016, an impoundment owner shall submit information on permanent replacement water supplies proposed to be provided to each household to the Department, including, at a minimum, the type of permanent water supply proposed;
the location of the household and its proximity to the nearest connection point to a public water supply; projected cost of the permanent water supply option proposed for the household; and any proposal to connect to a public
water supply. The Department shall evaluate information submitted by the impoundment owner and render a final decision to approve or disapprove the plan, including written findings of fact, no later than January 15, 2017. If
disapproved, an impoundment owner shall resubmit a plan for the Department’s approval within 30 days. No later than April 15, 2017, an impoundment owner shall notify all residents identified in the approved plan of their eligibility
for establishment of a permanent water supply. Until such time as an impoundment owner has established a permanent water supply for each household required by this subsection, the impoundment owner shall supply the household
with an alternate supply of potable drinking water and an alternate supply of water that is safe for other household uses. Nothing in this section shall be construed to (i) require an eligible household to connect to a public
water supply or receive a filtration system or (ii) obviate the need for other federal, State, and local permits and approvals. All State entities and local governments shall expedite any permits and approvals required for
such projects. The Department may grant an impoundment owner an extension of time, not to exceed one year, to establish permanent water supplies as required by this section, if the Department determines that it is infeasible
for the impoundment owner to establish a permanent water supply for a household by October 15, 2018, based on limitations arising from local government resources, including limitations on water supply capacity and staffing
limitations for permitting and construction activities.

Reporting. — In addition to any other reporting required by the Department, the owner of a coal combustion residuals surface impoundment shall submit an annual Groundwater Protection and Restoration Report to the Department no later than January 31 of
each year. The Report shall include a summary of all groundwater monitoring, protection, and restoration activities related to the impoundment for the preceding year, including the status of the Groundwater Assessment Plan, the
Groundwater Assessment Report, the Groundwater Corrective Action Plan, the Drinking Water Supply Well Survey, and the replacement of any contaminated drinking water supply wells.

History.
2014-122, s. 3(a); 2016-95, s. 1.

§ 130A-309.212.
Identification and assessment of discharges; correction of unpermitted discharges.

Identification of Discharges from Coal Combustion Residuals Surface Impoundments. —

The owner of a coal combustion residuals surface impoundment shall identify all discharges from the impoundment as provided in this subsection. The requirements for identifying all discharges from an impoundment set out in this subsection are in addition
to any other requirements for identifying discharges applicable to the owners of coal combustion residuals surface impoundments.

No later than December 31, 2014, the owner of a coal combustion residuals surface impoundment shall submit a topographic map that identifies the location of all (i) outfalls from engineered channels designed or improved for the purpose of collecting water
from the toe of the impoundment and (ii) seeps and weeps discharging from the impoundment that are not captured by engineered channels designed or improved for the purpose of collecting water from the toe of the impoundment
to the Department. The topographic map shall comply with all of the following:

Be at a scale as required by the Department.

Specify the latitude and longitude of each toe drain outfall, seep, and weep.

Specify whether the discharge from each toe drain outfall, seep, and weep is continuous or intermittent.

Provide an average flow measurement of the discharge from each toe drain outfall, seep, and weep including a description of the method used to measure average flow.

Specify whether the discharge from each toe drain outfall, seep, and weep identified reaches the surface waters of the State. If the discharge from a toe drain outfall, seep, or weep reaches the surface waters of the State, the map shall specify the latitude
and longitude of where the discharge reaches the surface waters of the State.

Include any other information related to the topographic map required by the Department.

Assessment of Discharges from Coal Combustion Residuals Surface Impoundments to the Surface Waters of the State. — The owner of a coal combustion residuals surface impoundment shall conduct an assessment of discharges from the coal combustion residuals
surface impoundment to the surface waters of the State as provided in this subsection. The requirements for assessment of discharges from the coal combustion residuals surface impoundment to the surface waters of the State set
out in this subsection are in addition to any other requirements for the assessment of discharges from coal combustion residuals surface impoundments to surface waters of the State applicable to the owners of coal combustion residuals
surface impoundments:

No later than December 31, 2014, the owner of a coal combustion residuals surface impoundment shall submit a proposed Discharge Assessment Plan to the Department. The Discharge Assessment Plan shall include information sufficient to allow the Department
to determine whether any discharge, including a discharge from a toe drain outfall, seep, or weep, has reached the surface waters of the State and has caused a violation of surface water quality standards. The Discharge
Assessment Plan shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:

Upstream and downstream sampling locations within all channels that could potentially carry a discharge.

A description of the surface water quality analyses that will be performed.

A sampling schedule, including the frequency and duration of sampling activities.

Reporting requirements.

Any other information related to the assessment of discharges required by the Department.

The Department shall approve the Discharge Assessment Plan if it determines that the Plan complies with the requirements of this subsection and will be sufficient to protect public health, safety, and welfare; the environment; and natural resources.

No later than 30 days from the approval of the Discharge Assessment Plan, the owner shall begin implementation of the Plan in accordance with the Plan’s schedule.

Corrective Action to Prevent Unpermitted Discharges from Coal Combustion Residuals Surface Impoundments to the Surface Waters of the State. — The owner of a coal combustion residuals surface impoundment shall implement corrective action to prevent unpermitted
discharges from the coal combustion residuals surface impoundment to the surface waters of the State as provided in this subsection. The requirements for corrective action to prevent unpermitted discharges from coal combustion
residuals surface impoundments to the surface waters of the State set out in this subsection are in addition to any other requirements for corrective action to prevent unpermitted discharges from coal combustion residuals surface
impoundments to the surface waters of the State applicable to the owners of coal combustion residuals surface impoundments:

If the Department determines, based on information provided pursuant to subsection (a) or (b) of this section, that an unpermitted discharge from a coal combustion residuals surface impoundment, including an unpermitted discharge from a toe drain outfall,
seep, or weep, has reached the surface waters of the State, the Department shall notify the owner of the impoundment of its determination.

No later than 30 days from a notification pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection, the owner of the coal combustion residuals surface impoundment shall submit a proposed Unpermitted Discharge Corrective Action Plan to the Department for its review
and approval. The proposed Unpermitted Discharge Corrective Action Plan shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:

One of the following methods of proposed corrective action:

Elimination of the unpermitted discharge.

Application for a National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System (NPDES) permit amendment pursuant to

G.S. 143-215.1

and Subchapter H of Chapter 2 of Title 15A of the North Carolina Administrative Code to bring the unpermitted discharge under permit regulations.

A detailed explanation of the reasons for selecting the method of corrective action.

Specific plans, including engineering details, to prevent the unpermitted discharge.

A schedule for implementation of the Plan.

A monitoring plan for evaluating the effectiveness of the proposed corrective action.

Any other information related to the correction of unpermitted discharges required by the Department.

The Department shall approve the Unpermitted Discharge Corrective Action Plan if it determines that the Plan complies with the requirements of this subsection and will be sufficient to protect public health, safety, and welfare; the environment; and natural
resources.

No later than 30 days from the approval of the Unpermitted Discharge Corrective Action Plan, the owner shall begin implementation of the Plan in accordance with the Plan’s schedule.

Identification of New Discharges. — No later than October 1, 2014, the owner of a coal combustion residuals surface impoundment shall submit a proposed Plan for the Identification of New Discharges to the Department for its review and approval as provided
in this subsection:

The proposed Plan for the Identification of New Discharges shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:

A procedure for routine inspection of the coal combustion residuals surface impoundment to identify indicators of potential new discharges, including toe drain outfalls, seeps, and weeps.

A procedure for determining whether a new discharge is actually present.

A procedure for notifying the Department when a new discharge is confirmed.

Any other information related to the identification of new discharges required by the Department.

The Department shall approve the Plan for the Identification of New Discharges if it determines that the Plan complies with the requirements of this subsection and will be sufficient to protect public health, safety, and welfare; the environment; and
natural resources.

No later than 30 days from the approval of the Plan for the Identification of New Discharges, the owner shall begin implementation of the Plan in accordance with the Plan.

Reporting. — In addition to any other reporting required by the Department, the owner of a coal combustion residuals surface impoundment shall submit an annual Surface Water Protection and Restoration Report to the Department no later than January 31
of each year. The Report shall include a summary of all surface water sampling, protection, and restoration activities related to the impoundment for the preceding year, including the status of the identification, assessment, and
correction of unpermitted discharges from coal combustion residuals surface impoundments to the surface waters of the State.

History.
2014-122, s. 3(a); 2016-95, s. 1.